src/morphology/affixes/nouns.lexc
LEXICON h33 ! høvur
 +N+Neu+Sg+Nom+Indef:ur Neu_Flag   ;
 +N+Neu+Sg+Nom+Def:dið Neu_Flag    ;
 +N+Neu+Sg+Acc+Indef:ur Neu_Flag   ;
 +N+Neu+Sg+Acc+Def:dið Neu_Flag    ;
 +N+Neu:d  S_N_SGD_i ;
 +N+Neu:uð S_N_SGG_s ;
 +N+Neu+Pl+Nom+Indef:ur Neu_Flag   ;
 +N+Neu+Pl+Nom+Def:dini Neu_Flag    ;
 +N+Neu+Pl+Acc+Indef:ur Neu_Flag   ;
 +N+Neu+Pl+Acc+Def:dini Neu_Flag    ;
 +N+Neu:d  N_PLD     ;
 +N+Neu:d  N_PLG     ;


LEXICON h34 ! fæ
h34e ;
h_flt34 ;

LEXICON h34e
+N+Neu:æ S_N_SGNA    ;
+N+Neu+Sg+Dat+Indef:æi Neu_Flag 		; ! fæi
 			 +N+Neu:æ  S_N_SGD  		; ! fæ, fænum
+N+Neu+Sg+Gen+Indef:íggjar Neu_Flag 	; ! fíggjar
  +N+Neu+Sg+Gen+Def:íggjarsins Neu_Flag ; ! fíggjarsins

 ! møguliga skal h_flt34 strikast  
LEXICON h_flt34
+N+Neu:æ N_PLNA      ;
+N+Neu:æ N_PLD       ;
+N+Neu:æ N_PLG       ;


! Leksikona h35 til og med h41 er __ikkje__ ferdig.


LEXICON h3e/kv2
 h3e ;
 kv2 ;

LEXICON h36
 h36e ;
 h_flt36 ;

LEXICON h36e
 +N+Neu+Sg+Nom+Indef:um Neu_Flag 	;   +N+Neu+Sg+Nom+Def:ið Neu_Flag ; 
+N+Neu+Sg+Acc+Indef:um Neu_Flag 	;   +N+Neu+Sg+Acc+Def:ið Neu_Flag ; 
 +N+Neu:  S_N_SGD_i ;
 +N+Neu:i S_N_SGG_s ;
 
LEXICON h_flt36 
 +N+Neu+Pl+Nom+Indef:i   Neu_Flag 	;
 +N+Neu+Pl+Nom+Indef:ir  Neu_Flag 	;
   +N+Neu+Pl+Nom+Def:ini Neu_Flag ;
 +N+Neu+Pl+Acc+Indef:i   Neu_Flag 	; 
 +N+Neu+Pl+Acc+Indef:ir  Neu_Flag 	; 
   +N+Neu+Pl+Acc+Def:ini Neu_Flag ;
 			  +N+Neu:  	 N_PLD     ;
 			  +N+Neu:    N_PLG     ;

 
LEXICON h37
 h37e ;
 h_flt37 ;
 
LEXICON h37e 
 +N+Neu+Sg+Nom+Indef:i Neu_Flag 	; 
  +N+Neu+Sg+Nom+Def:ið Neu_Flag ; 
  +N+Neu+Sg+Acc+Indef:i Neu_Flag 	;   
  +N+Neu+Sg+Acc+Def:ið Neu_Flag ; 
   +N+Neu:  S_N_SGD_i ;
 +N+Neu:i S_N_SGG_s ;


LEXICON h_flt37
 h_flt36 ;

LEXICON h40
+N+Neu+Sg+Nom+Indef:fur  	 Neu_Flag  ; 
  +N+Neu+Sg+Nom+Def:rið  	 Neu_Flag  ; 
+N+Neu+Sg+Acc+Indef:fur  	 Neu_Flag  ;   
  +N+Neu+Sg+Acc+Def:rið  	 Neu_Flag  ; 
+N+Neu+Sg+Dat+Indef:ri   	 Neu_Flag  ;   
  +N+Neu+Sg+Dat+Def:rinum  	 Neu_Flag  ; 
+N+Neu+Sg+Gen+Indef:furs  	 Neu_Flag  ;   
  +N+Neu+Sg+Gen+Def:fursins  Neu_Flag  ; 
+N+Neu+Pl+Nom+Indef:fur  	 Neu_Flag  ; 
  +N+Neu+Pl+Nom+Def:rini 	 Neu_Flag  ; 
+N+Neu+Pl+Acc+Indef:fur  	 Neu_Flag  ;   
  +N+Neu+Pl+Acc+Def:rini 	 Neu_Flag  ; 
+N+Neu+Pl+Dat+Indef:rum  	 Neu_Flag  ; 
  +N+Neu+Pl+Dat+Def:runum 	 Neu_Flag  ; 
+N+Neu+Pl+Gen+Indef:ra  	 Neu_Flag  ;   
  +N+Neu+Pl+Gen+Def:ranna 	 Neu_Flag  ; 

LEXICON h40_2
+N+Neu+Sg+Nom+Indef:tul 	 Neu_Flag  ; 
  +N+Neu+Sg+Nom+Def:lið 	 Neu_Flag  ; 
+N+Neu+Sg+Acc+Indef:tul 	 Neu_Flag  ;   
  +N+Neu+Sg+Acc+Def:lið 	 Neu_Flag  ; 
+N+Neu+Sg+Dat+Indef:li   	 Neu_Flag  ;   
  +N+Neu+Sg+Dat+Def:linum  	 Neu_Flag  ; 
+N+Neu+Sg+Gen+Indef:tuls  	 Neu_Flag  ;   
  +N+Neu+Sg+Gen+Def:tulsins  Neu_Flag  ; 
+N+Neu+Pl+Nom+Indef:tul  	 Neu_Flag  ; 
  +N+Neu+Pl+Nom+Def:lini  	 Neu_Flag  ; 
+N+Neu+Pl+Acc+Indef:tul 	 Neu_Flag  ;   
  +N+Neu+Pl+Acc+Def:lini	 Neu_Flag  ; 
+N+Neu+Pl+Dat+Indef:lum  	 Neu_Flag  ; 
  +N+Neu+Pl+Dat+Def:lunum 	 Neu_Flag  ; 
+N+Neu+Pl+Gen+Indef:la  	 Neu_Flag  ;   
  +N+Neu+Pl+Gen+Def:lanna 	 Neu_Flag  ; 


LEXICON h41/h9
 h41 ;
 h9 ;

LEXICON h41
h41e ;
h_flt41 ;

LEXICON h41e 
 h3e ;
 
LEXICON h_flt41 
 +N+Neu+Pl+Nom+Indef: Neu_Flag      ;
 +N+Neu+Pl+Acc+Indef: Neu_Flag      ;
 +N+Neu+Pl+Nom+Def:%>ini Neu_Flag      ;
 +N+Neu+Pl+Acc+Def:%>ini Neu_Flag      ;
 +N+Neu+Pl+Nom+Indef:%>ir Neu_Flag      ;
 +N+Neu+Pl+Acc+Indef:%>ir Neu_Flag      ;
 +N+Neu: N_PLD       ;
 +N+Neu: N_PLG	     ;





! =============== !
!! !!!Case inflection 
! =============== !

!! This is the second layer. Here we do indefinite
!! forms and compounds.

!! !!Masculine forms
! _______________

!! !Weak case suffixes.

!! Singular

LEXICON W_M_SGNOM
!! __@LEXNAME@__ for weak masculines, pointing to definites
 +Sg+Nom:%>i DF_N_SGm_indef ;
 +Sg+Nom:%>i DF_N_SGm_def   ;

LEXICON W_M_SGACC
!! __@LEXNAME@__ etc for risan
 +Sg+Acc:%>a DF_A_SGm ; 

LEXICON W_M_SGDAT
!! __@LEXNAME@__ for 
 +Sg+Dat:%>a DF_D_SGm ;

LEXICON W_M_SGDAT_mixed 
!! __@LEXNAME@__ for felagnum
 +Sg+Dat+Indef:%>a   ENDLEX ;
   +Sg+Dat+Def:%>num ENDLEX ;

LEXICON W_M_SGGEN
!! __@LEXNAME@__ for 
 +Sg+Gen+Indef:%>a   ENDLEX ;
 +Sg+Gen+Indef:%>a   R ; ! compound
   +Sg+Gen+Def:%>ans ENDLEX ; !XXX ans?



!! Plural

LEXICON W_M_PLNOM
!! __@LEXNAME@__ for -ar-
 +Pl+Nom:%>ar DF_N_PLm ;

LEXICON W_M_PLNOM_UR
!! __@LEXNAME@__ for -ur-
 +Pl+Nom:%>ur DF_N_PLm ;

LEXICON W_M_PLACC
!! __@LEXNAME@__ for -ar-
 +Pl+Acc:%>ar DF_A_PLm ;

LEXICON W_M_PLACC_UR
!! __@LEXNAME@__ for -ur-
 +Pl+Acc:%>ur DF_A_PLm ;

LEXICON W_M_PLDAT
!! __@LEXNAME@__ for -u-
 +Pl+Dat:%>u DF_D_PL ;

LEXICON W_M_PLGEN
!! __@LEXNAME@__ for -a-
 +Pl+Gen:%>a DF_G_PL ;




!! !Strong case suffixes
! ____________________


!! Nominative Sg

LEXICON S_M_SGNOM
 +Sg+Nom:%>ur  DF_N_SGm_indef ;
 +Sg+Nom:%>uri DF_N_SGm_def   ;

LEXICON S_M_SGNOM_NULL
 +Sg+Nom: DF_N_SGm ;
 +Sg+Nom: DF_N_SGm ;


!! Accusative Sg

LEXICON S_M_SGACC
 +Sg+Acc:    DF_A_SGm_indef ; !sand
 +Sg+Acc:%>i DF_A_SGm_def   ; !sandin
 +Sg+Acc:    R ; ! stem compound

!! Dative Sg

LEXICON S_M_SGDAT
 +Sg+Dat:%>i DF_D_SGm ;

LEXICON S_M_SGDAT_2
     +Sg+Dat:%>i          DF_D_SGm ;
 +Sg+Dat+Def:^GVDEL%>num ENDLEX        ;

LEXICON S_M_SGDAT_NULL
 +Sg+Dat: DF_D_SGm ;

! Genitive Sg

LEXICON S_M_SGGEN
 +Sg+Gen:%>s DF_G_SGm ;
 +Sg+Gen:%>s R ; ! gen compound

LEXICON S_M_SGGEN_NULL
 +Sg+Gen: DF_G_SGm ;
 +Sg+Gen: R ; ! gen compound

LEXICON S_M_SGGEN_AR
 +Sg+Gen:%>ar DF_G_SGm ;
 +Sg+Gen:%>ar R ; ! gen compound

!! Plural forms

!! Nominative

LEXICON S_M_PLNOM
 +Pl+Nom:%>ar DF_N_PLm ;

LEXICON S_M_PLNOM_IR
 +Pl+Nom:%>ir DF_N_PLm ;

LEXICON S_M_PLNOM_UR
 +Pl+Nom:%>ur DF_N_PLm ;

LEXICON S_M_PLNOM_NULL
 +Pl+Nom:    DF_N_PLm_indef ;
 +Pl+Nom:%>i DF_N_PLm_def   ;

LEXICON S_M_PLNOM_NULL_NULL
  +Pl+Nom:     DF_N_PLm_indef ;
  +Pl+Nom:     DF_N_PLm_def   ;
  

! Accusative

LEXICON S_M_PLACC
 +Pl+Acc:%>ar DF_A_PLm ;

LEXICON S_M_PLACC_IR
 +Pl+Acc:%>ir DF_A_PLm ;

LEXICON S_M_PLACC_UR
 +Pl+Acc:%>ur DF_A_PLm ;

LEXICON S_M_PLACC_NULL
 +Pl+Acc:    DF_A_PLm_indef ;
 +Pl+Acc:%>i DF_A_PLm_def   ;

LEXICON S_M_PLACC_NULL_NULL
  +Pl+Acc:     DF_A_PLm_indef ;
  +Pl+Acc:     DF_A_PLm_def   ;


! Dative

LEXICON S_M_PLDAT
 +Pl+Dat:%>u DF_D_PL ;

LEXICON S_M_PLDATm ! skóm
 +Pl+Dat: DF_D_PL ;

! Genitive

LEXICON S_M_PLGEN
 +Pl+Gen:%>a DF_G_PL ;
 +Pl+Gen:%>a R       ; ! gen pl compound


! Feminine forms
! ______________

! Singular case suffixes.

! Nominative

LEXICON W_F_SGNOM
 +Sg+Nom:%>a DF_N_SGf_W ;

LEXICON S_F_SGNAD
 +Sg+Nom: DF_N_SGf_S ;
 +Sg+Acc: DF_A_SGf_S ;
 +Sg+Acc: R ; ! stem compound
 +Sg+Dat: DF_D_SGf_S ;
 
! Oblique

LEXICON W_F_SGOBL
 +Sg+Acc:%>u DF_A_SGf_W ;
 +Sg+Dat:%>u DF_D_SGf_W ;
 +Sg+Gen:%>u DF_G_SGf_W ;

LEXICON S_F_SGGEN
 +Sg+Gen:%>ar DF_G_SGf_S ;
 +Sg+Gen:%>ar R ; ! gen compound

LEXICON S_F_SGGEN_NULL
 +Sg+Gen: DF_G_SGf_S ;




! Plural case suffixes

LEXICON F_PLNA_UR
 +Pl+Nom:%>ur DF_NA_PLf ;
 +Pl+Acc:%>ur DF_NA_PLf ;

LEXICON F_PLNA_IR
 +Pl+Nom:%>ir DF_NA_PLf ;
 +Pl+Acc:%>ir DF_NA_PLf ;

LEXICON F_PLNA_AR
 +Pl+Nom:%>ar DF_NA_PLf ;
 +Pl+Acc:%>ar DF_NA_PLf ;

LEXICON F_PLNA_NULL
 +Pl+Nom: DF_NA_PLf ;
 +Pl+Acc: DF_NA_PLf ;

LEXICON F_PLDAT
 +Pl+Dat:%>u DF_D_PL ;

LEXICON F_PLGEN
 +Pl+Gen:%>a DF_G_PL ;
 +Pl+Gen:%>a R ; ! gen compound


! Neuter forms
! ____________
! singular

LEXICON S_N_SGNA
 +Sg+Nom: DF_NA_SGn ;
 +Sg+Acc: DF_NA_SGn ;
 +Sg+Acc: R ; ! stem compound
 
LEXICON S_N_SGDG
 +Sg+Dat: DF_D_SGn ;
 +Sg+Gen: DF_G_SGn ;

LEXICON S_N_SGD
 +Sg+Dat: DF_D_SGn ;

LEXICON S_N_SGG
 +Sg+Gen: DF_G_SGn ;

LEXICON S_N_SGDG_is
  S_N_SGD_i ;
  S_N_SGG_s ;

LEXICON S_N_SGD_i
 +Sg+Dat:%>i DF_D_SGn ;

LEXICON S_N_SGG_s
 +Sg+Gen:%>s DF_G_SGn ;


LEXICON S_N_SGG_is
 +Sg+Gen:%>is DF_G_SGn ;

LEXICON 0_N_SGNA
 +Sg+Nom: DF_NA_SGn_indef ;
 +Sg+Nom: DF_NA_SGn_def   ;
 +Sg+Acc: DF_NA_SGn_indef ;
 +Sg+Acc: DF_NA_SGn_def   ;

LEXICON i_N_SGNA
 +Sg+Nom:%>i DF_NA_SGn_indef ;
 +Sg+Nom:%>i DF_NA_SGn_def   ;
 +Sg+Acc:%>i DF_NA_SGn_indef ;
 +Sg+Acc:%>i DF_NA_SGn_def   ;

!LEXICON i_N_SGDG_is
! +Sg+Gen:%>is DF_G_SGn ;
! +Sg+Dat:%>is DF_D_SGn ;

! plural
