src/morphology/stems/nouns.lexc
LEXICON Shortnouns 
fæ+CmpNP/None:f h34 ;
LEXICON Nouns
kriterium:kriteri h36 ;
deyðskriterium:deyðs#kriteri h36 ;
klimakterium:klimakteri h36 ;
klimaministerium:klima#ministeri h36 ;
matvøruministerium:mat#vøru#ministeri h36 ;
fakministerium:fak#ministeri h36 ;
energiministerium:energi#ministeri h36 ;
økonomiministerium:økonomi#ministeri h36 ;
sosialministerium:sosial#ministeri h36 ;
sunnheitsministerium:sunnheits#ministeri h36 ;
innanríkisministerium:innan#ríkis#ministeri h36 ;
menningarministerium:menningar#ministeri h36 ;
undirvísingarministerium:undir#vísingar#ministeri h36 ;
landbrúksministerium:land#brúks#ministeri h36 ;
forsvarsministerium:for#svars#ministeri h36 ;
justitsministerium:justits#ministeri h36 ;
ressortministerium:ressort#ministeri h36 ;
mysterium:mysteri h36 ;
delirium:deliri h36 ;
suspensorium:suspensori h36 ;
kommissorium:kommissori h36 ;
gitnaðarambulatorium:gitnaðar#ambulatori h36 ;
krematorium:krematori h36 ;
eksaminatorium:eksaminatori h36 ;
laboratorium:laboratori h36 ;
dentallaboratorium:dental#laboratori h36 ;
kuratorium:kuratori h36 ;
konservatorium:konservatori h36 ;
territorium:territori h36 ;
suppositorium:suppositori h36 ;
offertorium:offertori h36 ;
proprium:propri h36 ;
samansurium:samansuri h36 ;
gymnasium:gymnasi h36 ;
symposium:symposi h36 ;
spatium:spati h36 ;
artium:arti h36 ;
nasturtium:nasturti h36 ;
metall:metall h41 ;
syndrom:syndrom h41 ;
resume:resume h41 ;
rísalamang:rísalamang h41 ;
krystall:krystall h41/h9 ;
modell:modell h41 ;
problem:problem h41 ;
alkoholproblem:alkoholproblem h41 ;
system:system h41 ;
programm:programm h41 ;
video:video h41 ;
brúdleyp:brúdleyp h41 ;
skáp:skáp h41 ;
fabrikat:fabrikat h41 ;
worddokument:worddokument h41 ;
turistbureau:turistbureau h41 ;
niveau:niveau h41 ;
verdí:verdí h41 ;
partí:partí h41 ;
hálvfemsir:hálvfems h_flt41 ;
hálvtrýssir:hálvtrýss h_flt41 ;
hálvfjerðsir:hálvfjerðs h_flt41 ;
offur:of h40 ;
syndaoffur:synda#of h40 ;
syndoffur:synd#of h40 ;
eldoffur:eld#of h40 ;
skuldoffur:skuld#of h40 ;
brennioffur:brenni#of h40 ;
droypioffur:droypi#of h40 ;
roykoffur:royk#of h40 ;
mannoffur:mann#of h40 ;
sektaroffur:sektar#of h40 ;
bótaroffur:bótar#of h40 ;
fagnaðaroffur:fagnaðar#of h40 ;
sláturoffur:slátur#of h40 ;
drykkjuoffur:drykkju#of h40 ;
lovoffur:lov#of h40 ;
skurðoffur:skurð#of h40 ;
høvur:høv h33 ;
avgustahøvur:avgusta#høv h33 ;
neytahøvur:neyta#høv h33 ;
dylhøvur:dyl#høv h33 ;
livurhøvur:livur#høv h33 ;
veðurhøvur:veður#høv h33 ;
manshøvur:mans#høv h33 ;
janushøvur:janus#høv h33 ;
súluhøvur:súlu#høv h33 ;
náhøvur:ná#høv h33 ;
evangelii:evangeli h37 ;
sanatorii:sanatori h37 ;
kapittul:kapit h40_2 ;
amfibium:amfibi h36 ;
gradsadverbium:grads#adverbi h36 ;
tíðaradverbium:tíðar#adverbi h36 ;
stadium:stadi h36 ;
reivstadium:reiv#stadi h36 ;
medium:medi h36 ;
myndamedium:mynda#medi h36 ;
massimedium:massi#medi h36 ;
eturmedium:etur#medi h36 ;
yvirpresidium:yvir#presidi h36 ;
stipendium:stipendi h36 ;
kompendium:kompendi h36 ;
podium:podi h36 ;
postludium:post#ludi h36 ;
studium:studi h36 ;
fjarstudium:fjar#studi h36 ;
tíðarstudium:tíðar#studi h36 ;
sjálvstudium:sjálv#studi h36 ;
privilegium:privilegi h36 ;
refugium:refugi h36 ;
evangelium:evangeli h36 ;
konsilium:konsili h36 ;
kranium:krani h36 ;
decennium:decenni h36 ;
harmonium:harmoni h36 ;
opium:opi h36 ;
herbarium:herbari h36 ;
vokabularium:vokabulari h36 ;
pedagogseminarium:pedagog#seminari h36 ;
diplomatarium:diplomatari h36 ;
instrumentarium:instrumentari h36 ;
kambrium:kambri h36 ;
ambulatorii:ambulatori h37 ;
grón:grón h3e/kv2 ;
heiloffur:heil#of h40 ;
grónoffur:grón#of h40 ;
heitoffur:heit#of h40 ;
førleikafæ:før#leika#f h34e ;
fæ:f h34 ;
almannafæ:almanna#f h34e ;
leysafæ:leysa#f h34 ;
brotafæ:brota#f h34 ;
loysifæ:loysi#f h34 ;
tannfæ:tann#f h34 ;
stovnfæ:stovn#f h34 ;
dánarfæ:dánar#f h34 ;
festarfæ:festar#f h34 ;
sláturfæ:slátur#f h34 ;
stovnsfæ:stovns#f h34 ;
lánsfæ:láns#f h34 ;
ránsfæ:ráns#f h34 ;
borðfæ:borð#f h34 ;
búfæ:bú#f h34 ;
auditorii:auditori h37 ;
uttanríkisministerium:uttanríkisministeri h36 ;
arvafæ:arva#f h34e ;
